test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-miae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - miä: # Noun (37) miä 'eng what /est /fin' - full paradigm
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Nom: miä
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Gen: mink
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Par: midä
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ill: minkahe
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ine: minkan
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ela: minkast
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+All: minkalõ
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ade: minkal
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Abl: minkalt
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Tra: minkas
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ter: minkaniq
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Abe: minkaldaq
     miä+Pron+Interr+SP+Com: minkaq
